Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.050

Use of unrecorded brand prohibited—Exception.

No person shall place a brand on livestock for any purpose unless the brand is recorded with the director in the person's name.

[ 2003 c 326 s 9; 1959 c 54 s 5.]